District of Columbia statutes.
22-3227.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Financial injury” means all monetary costs, debts, or obligations incurred by a person as a result of another person obtaining, creating, possessing, or using that person’s personal identifying information in violation of this subchapter, including, but not limited to:

(A)

The costs of clearing the person’s credit rating, credit history, criminal record, or any other official record, including attorney fees;

(B)

The expenses related to any civil or administrative proceeding to satisfy or contest a debt, lien, judgment, or other obligation of the person that arose as a result of the violation of this subchapter, including attorney fees;

(C)

The costs of repairing or replacing damaged or stolen property;

(D)

Lost time or wages, or any similar monetary benefit forgone while the person is seeking redress for damages resulting from a violation of this subchapter; and

(E)

Lost time, wages, and benefits, other losses sustained, legal fees, and other expenses incurred as a result of the use, without permission, of one’s personal identifying information by another as prohibited by § 22-3227.02.

(2)

Repealed.

(3)

“Personal identifying information” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A)

Name, address, telephone number, date of birth, or mother’s maiden name;

(B)

Driver’s license or driver’s license number, or non-driver’s license or non-driver’s license number;

(C)

Savings, checking, or other financial account number;

(D)

Social security number or tax identification number;

(E)

Passport or passport number;

(F)

Citizenship status, visa, or alien registration card or number;

(G)

Birth certificate or a facsimile of a birth certificate;

(H)

Credit or debit card, or credit or debit card number;

(I)

Credit history or credit rating;

(J)

Signature;

(K)

Personal identification number, electronic identification number, password, access code or device, electronic address, electronic identification number, routing information or code, digital signature, or telecommunication identifying information;

(L)

Biometric data, such as fingerprint, voice print, retina or iris image, or other unique physical representation;

(M)

Place of employment, employment history, or employee identification number; and

(N)

Any other numbers or information that can be used to access a person’s financial resources, access medical information, obtain identification, act as identification, or obtain property.

(4)

“Property” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-3201(3) and shall include credit.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 127a
as added Mar. 27, 2004, D.C. Law 15-106, § 2(c), 50 DCR 9809
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 214(i), 56 DCR 7413

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-5501 and § 22-3132.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-88, in par. (1), deleted “and” from the end of subpar. (C); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of par. (D), and added subpar. (E); and repealed par. (2), which had read as follows: “(2) ‘Person’ means an individual, whether living or dead.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 102(h) of Crime Bill Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-129, June 29, 2009, 56 DCR 5495).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(i) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(i) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).